Utah statutes.
16-10a-727.   Greater quorum or voting requirements.

(1)  The articles of incorporation may provide for a greater quorum or voting requirement for shareholders, or voting groups of shareholders, than is provided for by this chapter.

(2)  An amendment to the articles of incorporation that changes or deletes a greater quorum or voting requirement shall meet the same quorum requirement and be adopted by the same vote and voting groups required to take action under the quorum and voting requirements then in effect.



Amended by Chapter 378, 2010 General Session

